Loading checkpoint shards:   0%|          | 0/3 [00:00<?, ?it/s]Loading checkpoint shards:  33%|███▎      | 1/3 [00:02<00:04,  2.15s/it]Loading checkpoint shards:  67%|██████▋   | 2/3 [00:04<00:02,  2.17s/it]Loading checkpoint shards: 100%|██████████| 3/3 [00:05<00:00,  1.87s/it]Loading checkpoint shards: 100%|██████████| 3/3 [00:05<00:00,  1.95s/it]
  0%|          | 0/20 [00:00<?, ?it/s]The attention layers in this model are transitioning from computing the RoPE embeddings internally through `position_ids` (2D tensor with the indexes of the tokens), to using externally computed `position_embeddings` (Tuple of tensors, containing cos and sin). In v4.46 `position_ids` will be removed and `position_embeddings` will be mandatory.
[Prompt]:
A British schoolgirl has died after being thrown from a horse while on holiday in India with her family. India Mayhew, seven, suffered serious head injuries after the horse bolted at a riding facility in Matheran 20 miles east of Mumbai. The youngster, who was on the second day of a holiday, was rushed to hospital from the hill station but doctors declared her dead on arrival. India Mayhew, seven, suffered serious head injuries after the horse bolted at a riding facility in Matheran 20 miles east of Mumbai (file picture) She had been riding just metres ahead of her
[Reference Response]:
father Gavin, 43, and a member of staff when the tragedy unfolded. Her mother, brother and two sisters were also riding in the grounds. The police said the member of staff and the girl's father managed to control the horse and rushed India to a nearby primary health centre. Sub inspector R N Khebude, of Matheran police, said: 'In his statement, Gavin said he was just behind his daughter and saw the entire incident. He said the horse suddenly went out of control and dragged her up to some distance, because of which she suffered serious injuries and died.' He said the victim's parents had chosen not to press charges against the operator, saying it was an accident. Police said India's father worked with a UK-based company and arrived in Mumbai (pictured) with his family on March 30, staying in a five-star hotel in the city . On the basis of the victim's parents statement, police have registered a case of accidental death. Doctors stated her cause of death as head injury and shock, it has been reported. Police said India's father worked with a UK-based company and arrived in Mumbai with his family on March 30. They were said to be staying at a five-star hotel in the city and went to the region of Matheran on Monday. A spokesperson for the British Deputy High Commission in Mumbai confirmed India's death, adding: 'We are providing consular assistance to the family at this difficult time.'
[Model Response]:
mother, Alison Mayhew, 48, when the horse reared and she was thrown from the saddle. Her mother, who was not injured, was told by a member of staff to carry on riding with India’s sister, Lily, five, who was on the back of the horse. India was rushed to a hospital in Matheran, but doctors pronounced her dead on arrival. A spokesman for the Foreign Office said: “We are supporting the family of a British woman following the death of her seven-year-old daughter in India.” The family were holidaying in Matheran, a popular tourist destination and hill station, about 100 miles from Mumbai.
The spokesman said: “We are supporting the family of a British woman following the death of her seven-year-old daughter in India.”
The family were holidaying in Matheran, a popular tourist destination and hill station, about 100 miles from Mumbai.
The spokesman said: “We are supporting the family of a British woman following the death of her seven-year-old daughter in India.” The family were holidaying in Matheran, a popular tourist destination and hill station, about 100 miles from Mumbai.
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.8863636363636364
  5%|▌         | 1/20 [00:06<02:01,  6.40s/it][Prompt]:
Although invisibility suits and hover cars are yet to become a reality, it turns out we might be closer to the future than we think. Austrian designers, Maya Pindeus, 24, and Johanna Pichlbauer, 25, have created a robot that takes the effort out of applying make-up - by doing it for you. The device applies eyeliner with a long black brush, while an attachment smears lipstick on lips, before lighting up when the process is complete. Scroll down for video . There's clearly still a few precision kinks with the Beautification machine created by Austrian designers Maya Pindeus and Johanna
[Reference Response]:
Pichlbauer . A visitor lets the machine apply her red lipstick thanks to a crank which creates a circular rotation . The robot made its debut at the exhibition, Biennale Internationale Design Saint-Etienne 2015, in France, and gallery visitors were in for a treat. The machine is composed of three components: a lipstick wheel, an eyeliner applicator, and a mask which illuminates when the 'beautification' was complete. Women were then filmed testing the machine for the two University of Vienna students' art project entitled Beautification. When creating a device for such a personal ritual as applying make-up, anyone would think that the robots would favour precision and speed, but this was - hilariously- not the case. The beginning of the video shows the designers setting up and creating the machine's frame which includes two magnified mirrors. Each device is fitted with chin rests in order to let the user know where to position their faces. Another girl has felt the wrath of the machine, which has dealt her face many random strokes of eyeliner . A gallery visitor rests her head on the chin rest, expecting eyeliner to be expertly applied . The eyeliner is fixed to a robotic arm, which moves the brush in a movement intended to mimic that of a hand, against the backdrop of a mirror with the motto, 'with determined brush strokes the cosmetic ritual takes its course' inscribed into the glass. The lipstick wand is secured to a crank which rotates in small circles. Once each area has been completed, a mask threaded with LEDs lights up in the corresponding part of the female face. The video shows how it's only when visitors begin trying out the make-up robot that they realise precision is not the machine's greatest attribute. Each woman rests their chin on the chin-rest and the eyeliner brush is seen swiping wildly, leaving them with smears of kohl on their foreheads, eyelids and along the bridge of their nose. At one point the robot actually smears the eyeliner directly into a unsuspecting girl's eye. The lipstick robot is slightly more successful than the eyeliner robot, as the user can control how much lipstick is applied . Next a woman trials the lipstick wand but the speedy circular rotation of the lipstick isn't well aligned to the natural shape of a pair of lips. The user is left with a circular smudge over her lips and chin. But Pindeus and Pichlbauer say the robots weren't intended to revolutionise make-up, explaining: 'We wanted to explore the relationship between humans and machines.' The designers found the results of the art project were differed from their initial expectations. 'We expected the outcome to be threatening and a little creepy but instead we discovered a very affectionate side in our robot. One woman is waiting for her eyeliner to be applied, with her face directly aligned with the brush . She gets a shock when the eyeliner brush swipes directly into her eye . 'The interaction with our machine made people smile. Its tireless spins, the way it didn’t quite succeed, it seemed to have its own ideas of what looked good in a human face.' On their Tumblr page, the pair explain the inspiration for the project: 'Without us paying much attention, many processes and rituals in our lives have been taken over by machines which are said to be cold and unemotional.' The designers added: 'Our machines, however, have their own will, their own ideals. We want to put users in the beauty care of robots, to experience what it feels like when delicate decisions that are usually made by themselves are now determined by machines.' The third component of the make-up robots is a light mask (pictured), which is meant to illuminate parts of the face it is satisfied with .
[Model Response]:
Pichlbauer, but it's a start. The robot, which is powered by a small motor, is able to apply eyeliner and lipstick to the face of its human owner.
The robot, which is powered by a small motor, is able to apply eyeliner and lipstick to the face of its human owner.
The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna.
The robot, which is powered by a small motor, is able to apply eyeliner and lipstick to the face of its human owner. The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna.
The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna. The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna.
The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna. The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna. The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna.
The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna.
The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna. The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna.
The device, which is currently in prototype form, was created by the design duo as part of their master's degree course at the University of Applied Arts in Vienna.
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9754464285714286
 10%|█         | 2/20 [00:17<02:40,  8.92s/it][Prompt]:
(CNN)A former U.S. Army enlistee who posted on Facebook about "the adrenaline rush" of dying in jihad was arrested Friday and charged with trying to detonate a car bomb at Fort Riley military base in Kansas, authorities said. A second man, who allegedly knew about the bomb plot but didn't call authorities, was charged with failing to report a felony. John T. Booker Jr. of Topeka, an American citizen also known as Mohammed Abdullah Hassan, was taken into custody near Manhattan, Kansas, in a van that contained what he thought was a bomb, the criminal complaint said. The "bomb" had
[Reference Response]:
actually been put together by two confidential informants with nonexplosive materials, the complaint said. Fort Riley's security was never breached and no people were in danger, the U.S. Justice Department said in a press release. Booker enlisted in the Army last year and was due to ship out to basic training April 7, 2014, said Army spokesman Wayne Hall. The criminal complaint said the FBI questioned him March 24, 2014 about comments posted on Facebook, such as, "Getting ready to be killed in jihad is a HUGE adrenaline rush. I am so nervous. NOT because I'm scare to die but I am eager to meet my lord." Booker waived his Miranda rights and told the agents he enlisted to commit an insider attack against American soldiers like Maj. Nidal Hassan had done at Fort Hood, Texas, the complaint said. Hassan opened fire in a building in November 2009, killing 13 people and wounding more than 30. His enlistment was terminated March 24, 2014, at the request of Army Criminal Investigation Command, Hall said. Booker began communicating with a confidential informant later in 2014, the complaint said, and often talked about his plans to engage in violent jihad in support of ISIS. He and the informant watched ISIS videos together, the complaint said, and Booker talked about how he wanted to go to Iraq and turn his weapon on American soldiers when ordered to shoot the enemy. On March 9, Booker said he believed ISIS wanted him to commit a truck bombing in the United States and thought a good target would be nearby Fort Riley, a large Army base that's home to the 1st Infantry Division, known as "The Big Red One." Booker said "that detonating a suicide bomb is his No. 1 aspiration because he couldn't be captured, all evidence would be destroyed and he would be guaranteed to hit his target," the criminal complaint said. He made a video with a Fort Riley airfield in the background and said ISIS was coming to kill American soldiers, both abroad and in the United States, the complaint said. Booker acquired components for a bomb and rented a storage locker to store the components, the complaint said. The plan was for confidential informants to build a bomb and for Booker to drive to Fort Riley and detonate it, the complaint said. But the bomb was built with "inert" parts and would never explode, the complaint said. On Friday, the informants and Booker drove to what Booker thought was a little-used utility gate near Fort Riley, the complaint said. While Booker was making final connections on the "bomb," the FBI arrested him, the complaint said. He was charged with one count of attempting to use a weapon of mass destruction, one count of attempting to damage property by means of an explosive and one count of attempting to provide material support to the Islamic State of Iraq, a designated foreign terrorist organization. If convicted, he could face life in prison. Alexander E. Blair, 28, of Topeka was taken into custody Friday and charged with failing to report a felony. The FBI said agents interviewed Blair after Booker's arrest. Blair said he shared some of Booker's views, knew of his plans to detonate a vehicle bomb at Fort Riley and loaned him money to rent storage space, according to the FBI's criminal complaint. He said he thought Booker would carry out his plan but did not contact authorities, the complaint said. If convicted, Blair faces a maximum of three years in prison.
[Model Response]:
been rigged by a bomb-squad technician, the complaint said.
Booker told investigators he had been inspired by ISIS videos and had recently converted to Islam, according to the complaint. He said he was upset over U.S. military actions in the Middle East and that he wanted to die as a martyr, the complaint said. Booker was being held at the Riley County Jail in Manhattan, Kansas. The second man, 21-year-old Shannon M. Conley of Wichita, Kansas, was arrested Friday at a Wichita airport and was being held at the Sedgwick County Jail, authorities said. Conley told investigators that he knew about the plot and had told Booker not to do it, the complaint said. Conley also told investigators that he was a Muslim convert who had recently traveled to Turkey and Syria, the complaint said. Conley said he was upset over the U.S. military actions in the Middle East and that he wanted to die as a martyr, the complaint said.
A third man, 20-year-old Joseph M. Davis of Topeka, was arrested Thursday and charged with making false statements to federal agents. Davis, who is white, told investigators that he was a member of a white supremacist group, but he later recanted and said he was lying, the complaint said.
Davis was being held at the Shawnee County Jail in Topeka, Kansas, the complaint said. The FBI and the Army's Criminal Investigation Command are investigating the case.
CNN's Nick Valencia contributed to this report.
http://www.cnn.com/2015/08/29/us/fort-riley-bomb-plot/
Syrian refugees arrive in Germany
Turkey's parliament votes to extend state of emergency
Syrian refugees arrive in Germany | 29 Aug 2015 | More than 100 refugees from Syria arrived in Germany on Saturday, the first group of a new wave of arrivals that the government has said could reach 800,000 by the end of the year. The refugees arrived in the German city of Munich on a flight from Turkey, and were
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.8492063492063492
 15%|█▌        | 3/20 [00:28<02:51, 10.12s/it][Prompt]:
All eyes were again on Jimmy Anderson as England on Thursday night began their push for victory here but instead the limelight was seized by Chris Jordan with his second stunning catch of the first Test. A day that featured a fourth Test century in only his ninth match for Gary Ballance ended with the leader of England’s attack still waiting for the wicket that will bring him level with Sir Ian Botham’s Test record. So well did Ballance and England bat that Alastair Cook was able to set West Indies a target of 438 in just over four sessions
[Reference Response]:
that would even surpass their own world record successful Test chase. Yet so solidly did West Indies begin their attempt to emerge unscathed from this first of three Tests that it became pertinent to remember that record was set in none other than Antigua and featured a century by a certain Shiv Chanderpaul. It remains highly unlikely that West Indies will today surpass the 418 for seven they made to defeat Australia at the old St John’s Rec 12 years ago. Cook, though, will be grateful for the athleticism of Jordan and the off-spin of Joe Root for the wicket that means England remain firm favourites to secure today what would be a highly valuable victory for them. When West Indies grafted their way to 90 for one on this fourth day it was possible to believe that they would at least be able to escape with a draw from this match and head to Grenada next week still all square. Yet When Jordan dived to his right at wide slip and grasped the chance offered by Darren Bravo’s flailing bat in Root’s second over a second West Indian wicket had fallen and England ended the day with a spring in their step. They still have much to do and all results remain possible but England will be much the happier with West Indies finishing on 98 for two, still a massive 340 short of recreating Antiguan Test history. For Anderson, however, there was just more frustration as he could not strike a blow in the seven overs he has so far bowled in the second innings. Botham remains in the wings, with a nice bottle of red at the ready, to congratulate Anderson if and when the big moment comes today. England timed both the pace of their batting and their declaration to perfection, scoring quickly enough to set West Indies that world record breaking target and giving themselves 130 overs to bowl them out. And at the centre of their batting effort was Ballance who has made a start to his Test career that can genuinely be described as great. Darren Bravo nicks Joe Root's delivery as Chris Jordan gets ready to pounce . Bravo can only watch on as Jordan makes a stunning dive to seize the loose ball . Jordan shows tremendous reflexes to cling on to dismiss the West Indies batsman . Gary Ballance plays a shot during day four of England's first Test against West Indies on Thursday . Ballance plays a sweeping shot during his impressive innings at the Sir Vivian Richards Stadium . Ballance celebrates bringing up his century following his superb batting display in Antigua . Joe Root formed a solid partnership with Ballance and made big inroads against the home side . Root salutes the stands after he brought up his half century earlier in the day . Jos Buttler also impressed for Peter Moores' side with an unbeaten 59 off 56 balls . It is extraordinary, really, that Ballance should have been perceived to be under any sort of pressure going into the second innings of this first Test. Yes, he had a poor World Cup after being thrown into the England team with little preparation ahead of their opening match against Australia. And, yes, Ballance looked tentative in the first innings here at the Sir Viv Richards Stadium, pushing at a ball with hard hands he could have left alone. Yet memories are short these days and it should be remembered that Ballance had an extraordinary summer last year having been asked to bat in a position at No 3 he was unaccustomed to by coach Peter Moores. This was the Ballance of last season, the white shirt seemingly a much better fit than the blue of limited-overs cricket, and he is quite simply a run machine in the ultimate form of the game. Root was furious with himself when he again got an inside edge to be bowled when a century was there for the taking but his partnership of 114 with Ballance came at a crucial time for England with West Indies still in the hunt. It says everything about Ballance’s 122 that the only time he looked in trouble was when Jos Buttler hit Sulieman Benn straight back at him and struck his batting partner a nasty blow on the elbow. Other than that it was pretty much plain sailing for England, with Jos Buttler also returning to form with an unbeaten 59 off 56 balls. Stuart Broad (centre) celebrates with his England team-mates after taking the wicket of Kraigg Brathwaite . Root (right) gets the plaudits from his team-mates after he took the wicket of Bravo late on day four . The openers, of course, are much more of an issue but a win here on Friday would buy Cook a bit of time for both him and Jonathan Trott to get things right in Grenada next week and Barbados in the final Test. With Anderson in the form that saw him take only two of the four wickets he needed at the start of this Test to surpass Botham’s tally of 383 in the first innings it was left to Stuart Broad to strike the first blow for England. An absolute brute of a delivery saw Kraigg Braithwaite fending to short leg and Broad quickly pointing to the dressing room to salute the role that bowling coach Ottis Gibson, who knows West Indies inside out having been their coach until earlier this year, played in the dismissal. James Anderson unsuccessfully appeals for the wicket of Bravo earlier in the contest . He is one of the best slip fielders England have found in years but Jordan will be annoyed he could not pouch another chance offered by Devon Smith before the close. Smith lived to fight another day on 59 and he too was in West Indies’ side that famous day in 2003 when history was made. If he is part of history again then it will have been an extraordinary last day. Any hopes of a West Indies collapse quickly faded and all was quiet until Jordan’s intervention to replicate his similar diving effort in the first innings. The West Indies side await a decision from the third empire on the fourth day of action in the Caribbean . He is clearly one of the best slip fielders England have found in years but Jordan will be annoyed that he could not get a hand to another sharp chance offered by Devon Smith off Root before the close. Smith lives to fight another day on 59 and it should be pointed out that he too was in West Indies side that famous day in 2003 when history was made on this island. If he is part of history again then it really will have been an extraordinary last day.
[Model Response]:
on the final day of a Test that has seen the series swung back and forth.
Jordan’s catch in the morning was one of those moments that will live long in the memory of anyone who saw it, but it was only the second time that he has taken a Test catch. The first was in the second innings of the same Test and, as with that one, it came at the expense of Darren Bravo, who was bowled by Jordan’s legspin.
Jordan’s first catch was a more straightforward affair. He had been in the field for just two balls when he took a one-handed grab at a high, looping delivery from Stuart Broad that was heading for the boundary. Jordan’s dive to his left was a textbook example of how to take a catch and, even though the ball was travelling slowly, it was an outstanding piece of fielding.
On Thursday morning, Jordan was in the same position at the other end of the field, and again Broad was the bowler. This time, however, the ball was moving more quickly and Jordan had to dive to his right. As he did so, he reached up and plucked the ball out of the air. It was an even more spectacular catch than the first, and one that will live long in the memory of anyone who saw it.
Jordan is now one of just three players to have taken two Test catches in the same match. The other two are the Australian fast bowler Brett Lee, who took two in the same match against South Africa in 2006-07, and the former Sri Lankan offspinner Muttiah Muralitharan, who took two in the same match against India in 1998-99.
Ballance’s 147 was his first Test century since 2012 and, in the process, he became the first England player to score a century in each innings of a Test match since Andrew Strauss in 2010. He also became the first England player to score a century in each innings of a Test match on the same ground since Peter May in 1957.
Ballance’s 147 was his first Test century since 2012 and, in the process, he became the first England player to score a century in each inn
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.8577154308617234
 20%|██        | 4/20 [00:41<02:57, 11.10s/it][Prompt]:
Massachusetts Senator Elizabeth Warren says she's relieved Dzhokhar Tsarnaev has been found guilty of carrying out the Boston bombing - the greatest tragedy in her state's recent history - but doesn't believe he should be executed. In an interview with CBS This Morning on Thursday, Warren reacted to Wednesday's jury verdict which found the 21-year-old guilty on all 30 charges related to the Boston Marathon explosions which killed three and injured hundreds at the finish line. 'Nothing is ever going to make those who were injured whole and it's been a terrible thing but this is a step toward justice,'
[Reference Response]:
Warren said. When asked what she would like to see happen in the penalty stage of the trial, liberal-minded Warren stuck by her anti-death penalty stance. 'My heart goes out to the families here but I don't support the death penalty. I think that he should spend his life in jail - no possibility of parole - he should die in prison. But that's just how I see it. It's up to the jury,' she said. Scroll down for video . Life in prison: Massachusetts Senator Elizabeth Warren said Thursday that she doesn't believe convicted Boston bomber Dzhokhar Tsarnaev should be sentenced to death. Warren pictured left on CBS This Morning on Thursday. Tsarnaev pictured right in Boston federal court on Wednesday as his guilty verdict was read . Warren went on to speak about current Democratic party issues, as well as comment and likely presidential candidate Hillary Clinton. However, the woman once thought to be a front-runner for her party refused to compare her politics to the former secretary of state. Warren has repeatedly denied that she will run in the Democratic primaries. Now that Tsarnaev has been found guilty of committing the Boston Marathon bombings, the case will move on to the penalty stage of the trail which could begin as early as Monday. It is in this stage of the trial that the jury will decide whether or not to sentence Tsarnaev to life in prison or the death penalty - a matter in which they will have to vote unanimously. Justice: Boston Marathon bombing survivor Karen Brassard, second from left, speaks alongside Carlos Arredondo, left, Laurie Scher, second from right, and Mike Ward, on Wednesday following the conviction of Dzhokhar Tsarnaev . While the defense rarely cross-examined witnesses in the first portion of the trial, they will be more active in the next stage as they attempt to convince the jury against sentencing Tsarnaev to death. One thing Tsarnaev's favor is his lead defense attorney Judy Clarke, who specializes in death penalty cases and spared notorious killers like Unabomber Ted Kaczynski from execution. Clarke's method is to humanize her client to the jury, with stories about their life which might explain what led them to commit such heinous crimes. In the first portion of the trial, the defense alluded to an argument that then 19-year-old Tsarnaev was influenced by his radicalized older brother Tamerlan. Attorneys will likely continue that storyline with this next phase of the trial, exploring the brothers relationship, their childhood in Soviet Russia and Kyrgzstan and their later immigration to the U.S. with their parents. However, legal experts say saving Tsarnaev from the death penalty will be her toughest job yet. Secret weapon: Tsarnaev's lead defense attorney, Judy Clarke, specializes in death penalty cases and has spared several of her notorious killer clients from execution by humanizing them to the jury. Pictured above leaving court on Wednesday, after hearing the guilty verdict for Tsarnaev . 'I haven't yet heard all the mitigating factors you'd expect to hear. In traditional death penalty cases, it's physical abuse, sexual abuse, drug abuse, dropping out of school,' Meg Penrose, a death penalty expert at Texas A&M University School of Law, said. However, Tsarnaev has yet another advantage of being put on trial in Massachusetts since the state outlawed capital punishment in 1984. While the death penalty is not allowed in state cases, Tsarnaev is being tried in federal court which makes the death penalty a possible sentencing option. However, experts say that since the jury was pulled from a pool of Massachusetts residents, they could decided against the death penalty as a reflection of the state's general politics on the issue. The prosecution will also have to convince the jury while Tsarnaev should be sentenced to death, proving that the crime was carried out with certain aggravating factors that warrant execution. So far they've listed such factors as killing a child and planning the attack for the day of the Marathon to maximize the loss of life.
[Model Response]:
Warren said. 'I am relieved that the jury came back with a guilty verdict.' The Democrat senator, who represents Massachusetts, said the state's capital punishment law should be repealed.
Dzhokhar Tsarnaev has been found guilty of all 30 charges in the Boston Marathon bombings.
A jury convicted Tsarnaev of using a weapon of mass destruction and killing three people in the April 2013 attack that killed three people and injured more than 260 others.
The jury reached its verdict after about 14 hours of deliberations over three days.
Tsarnaev, 21, showed no emotion as the verdict was read.
He will be sentenced on June 17.
Prosecutors have asked for the death penalty, but defense lawyers have said their client is remorseful and should receive life in prison.
Tsarnaev's lawyers have said he was influenced by his radicalized older brother, Tamerlan, who died after a shootout with police.
Tamerlan Tsarnaev and his younger brother planted two homemade pressure-cooker bombs near the marathon's finish line on April 15, 2013.
The bombs exploded about 12 seconds apart, tearing off limbs, causing shrapnel wounds and blowing off body parts.
Tamerlan Tsarnaev died days later after a gunbattle with police.
Dzhokhar Tsarnaev was found hiding in a boat in a backyard in Watertown, Mass., days after the bombings.
He was arrested after a tense standoff with police that ended when he was shot in the shoulder and captured.
The brothers' mother, Zubeidat Tsarnaeva, said the verdict was unjust.
'It's not fair,' she said. 'I'm not happy. I'm not happy at all.'
The Boston Marathon bombing killed three people and injured more than 260 others.
Prosecutors said the Tsarnaevs were influenced by extremist Islamic teachings.
The brothers were ethnic Chechens who came to the U.S. from Russia in 2002.
Boston Marathon Bombing Jury Reaches Verdict

[Acceptance Rate]: 0.8388998035363457
 25%|██▌       | 5/20 [00:52<02:49, 11.32s/it][Prompt]:
At Tokyo's Narita Airport, the newly-opened Terminal 3 sure has some quirky features. Among them, strips of brightly-coloured running track, which have been installed in the airport's hallways. While of course passengers are entertained by the latest buzzworthy stunt, we have to wonder: were they really intended to encourage travellers to dash to their boarding gate? Tokyo's Narita Airport has installed running tracks in its new Terminal 3 in honour of the 2020 Olympics . Turns out that the cushioned tracks were actually designed to celebrate the 2020 Olympics, which will be held in Tokyo. But there's no denying that
[Reference Response]:
the footpaths are extremely useful regardless. The blue path leads passengers toward departures, while arrivals can be reached by following the red pathway. Further, in each lane there are a series of icons, which include information such as the distance to other terminals, directions to nearby restaurants and shops and where to find outside transport options. The recently-opened terminal will be primarily used for departures and arrivals of low-cost carriers . To save money, the airport installed these cushioned running tracks, which also include directional information . All of the blue lanes lead towards the departure area, while the red track leads travellers to arrivals . The new terminal, which will be used for many of the city's low-cost carrier departures, first opened on April 8 and according to the website, the aim of the innovative tracks was, in part, to save money. 'To cut costs, we opted not to install the typical moving walkways or illuminated signs,' the terminal's website reads. 'Instead, to offer an exciting walking experience that is easy on the feet, we implemented running tracks used for track and field, and added signage for user-friendly guidance.'
[Model Response]:
the colourful strips are a fun addition to the airport.
The airport's new terminal is home to 12 gates, a 12,000-square-metre food hall, and a 10,000-square-metre garden. The running tracks are located in the airport's corridors, and they're available for passengers to use while they're waiting for their flight. The terminal's designers hope that the tracks will encourage travellers to stay active.
The track is 120 metres long, and it's designed to look like a colourful ribbon. The track is made of recycled plastic, and it's intended to encourage people to use the airport's fitness centre.
The running track is located in the airport's corridors, and it's available for passengers to use while they're waiting for their flight. The terminal's designers hope that the tracks will encourage travellers to stay active.
The terminal is located on the outskirts of Tokyo, and it's scheduled to open in 2020. The new terminal is designed to handle 40 million passengers annually, and it's intended to be a hub for low-cost airlines.
The new terminal is home to 12 gates, a 12,000-square-metre food hall, and a 10,000-square-metre garden. The running tracks are located in the airport's corridors, and they're available for passengers to use while they're waiting for their flight.
The terminal's designers hope that the tracks will encourage travellers to stay active. The terminal is located on the outskirts of Tokyo, and it's scheduled to open in 2020. The new terminal is designed to handle 40 million passengers annually, and it's intended to be a hub for low-cost airlines.
The running tracks are located in the airport's corridors, and they're available for passengers to use while they're waiting for their flight. The terminal's designers hope that the tracks will encourage travellers to stay active.
The running tracks are located in the airport's corridors, and they're available for
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9113924050632911
 30%|███       | 6/20 [01:03<02:36, 11.20s/it][Prompt]:
Hull City are keen on signing Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt. The 20-year-old has impressed this season scoring nine goals and has drawn admiring glances from several Premier League clubs. Hull manager Steve Bruce is keen to snap up any promising British talent as he looks to rebuild for the summer. Providing his side can escape the drop Mowatt is one of the players who he is interested in. Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt (right) celebrates scoring a goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors .
[Reference Response]:
Hull sent scout John Rudge to check on Mowatt during Monday's 4-3 defeat by Wolves. The England U20 international gave Leeds brief hope of an unlikely point by scoring their third goal and turned in a decent performance. Along with full-back Sam Byram, Lewis Cook and Charlie Taylor, Mowatt will be a target for clubs in the summer as they look to plunder Leeds' promising talent. Hull City manager Steve Bruce is keen to bolster the amount of homegrown talent in his squad this summer . Leeds' right-back Sam Byram (right) is another of the club's homegrown players attracting outside interest . Mowatt graduated from Leeds' academy in 2013 and has since gone on to star for the first-team this term .
[Model Response]:
Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors . Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors . Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors . Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors . Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors . Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors . Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors . Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors . Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday . The 20-year-old has impressed in the Championship this season and has attracted several top-flight suitors . Leeds United midfielder Alex Mowatt celebrates scoring his side's first goal against Wolves on Monday .
[Acceptance Rate]: 1.0
 35%|███▌      | 7/20 [01:13<02:19, 10.72s/it][Prompt]:
Serie A club Parma have been deducted four points for breaching financial regulations. The sanction adds to the three they were penalised earlier in the season, the Italian Football Federation (FIGC) said on Thursday. Parma's players celebrate beating Juventus at the weekend but the club are rooted to the bottom of Serie A . The decision means that Parma, who despite being last in Serie A beat leaders Juventus 1-0 on Saturday, have been left with 12 points from 30 games. The club were declared bankrupt last month and have not paid their players all season.
[Reference Response]:

[Model Response]:
The FIGC said that the deduction was due to "the seriousness of the offence and the fact that the club has already been punished for the same offence". Parma were deducted three points in October for failing to pay the players' wages on time. They were then docked three more points for failing to pay the wages of the players who had left the club. "Parma are therefore deducted four points for the same offence," the FIGC said. The club's players, who have not been paid since December, have been training in the northern city of Reggio Emilia. The club's owner, Abdullah Al-Thani, has been trying to sell the club and has received a number of offers. The FIGC said that the deduction could be reduced if the club paid the players' wages and the club's debts by 15 May. Parma have been deducted four points for breaching financial regulations. The sanction adds to the three they were penalised earlier in the season, the Italian Football Federation (FIGC) said on Thursday. Parma's players celebrate beating Juventus at the weekend but the club are rooted to the bottom of Serie A . The decision means that Parma, who despite being last in Serie A beat leaders Juventus 1-0 on Saturday, have been left with 12 points from 30 games. The club were declared bankrupt last month and have not paid their players all season. The FIGC said that the deduction was due to "the seriousness of the offence and the fact that the club has already been punished for the same offence". Parma were deducted three points in October for failing to pay the players' wages on time. They were then docked three more points for failing to pay the wages of the players who had left the club. "Parma are therefore deducted four points for the same offence," the FIGC said. The club's players, who have not been paid since December, have been training in the northern city of Reggio Emilia. The club's owner, Abdullah Al-Thani, has been trying to sell the club and has received a number of offers. The FIGC said that the deduction could be reduced if the club paid the players' wages and the club's debts
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9212765957446809
 40%|████      | 8/20 [01:23<02:06, 10.51s/it][Prompt]:
She's been photographed hundreds of times and starred in magazines and TV advertisements but you won't have seen her face - until now. Emily Grimson, from Shopshire, is one of Britain's most successful models yet it's not her stunning face that's her fortune - it's her perfect hands. And the 25-year-old has only been modelling for a year but has already built a lucrative full-time career making up to £100 an hour. Professional model Emily, 25, from Shropshire, gets paid £100 an hour - but it's unlikely you've seen her face . Professional hand model Emily, has appeared everywhere from
[Reference Response]:
television screens to magazine ads . She's on course to become a hand supermodel after her high-earning hands featured in product videos for Bosch, adverts on the Disney Channel and advertorials in the Sunday Times Style magazine. Not one to put her assets at risk, Emily, a former beauty writer, moisturises her hands up to ten times a day to keep them looking their best. Emily said: 'I used to write the beauty pages for a bridal magazine but everyone would mention how lovely my hands are. 'I started hand modelling around about May last year and have been doing it full time since autumn. 'Work can vary; sometimes I work for one client for a couple of weeks, sometimes I do odd days here and there for various different brands and products - no week or month is the same. 'I love it, you can make anything from £100 a day to £100 an hour, and if you film a commercial, you may even be paid a buyout fee.' The stunning brunette has only been modelling for a year but has already built a lucrative full-time career . She moisturises her hands up to ten times a day to keep them looking their best . She exfoliates them once a week and always wears a strengthener to keep her nails from snapping . Emily used to write the beauty pages for a magazine but everyone would mention how lovely her hands are . Emily, who is signed with BMA Models, was encouraged to give hand modelling a shot after a nail technician complimented her hands while giving her a manicure. Since signing up for the modelling agency last year she has posed with everything from designer bags to electrical appliances, and always goes to great lengths to protect her hands. Emily said: 'I do have a strict routine to keep my hands looking their best. 'I moisturise them about ten times a day and always use SPF to protect them, even when the sun isn't shining. 'I exfoliate them once a week and always wear a strengthener to keep my nails from snapping. 'Sometimes I ask other people to open bottles or packets for me when I have a big job coming up as I don't want to risk any scratches or breakages. 'Oh, and I won't let my boyfriend get a kitten, despite the fact that he loves them, as a manicurist on a job warned me they carry a major scratching risk.' Since signing with BMA Models last year, her hands have starred in ads from designer bags to appliances . Emily says the money can be really good. if you film a commercial, you may even be paid a buyout fee . She started hand modelling around about May last year and has been doing it full time since autumn .
[Model Response]:
the pages of Vogue to a TV advert for Procter & Gamble. The 25-year-old, who is based in Shropshire, has been modelling for a year but already has a full-time career, earning up to £100 an hour.
Professional hand model Emily, has appeared everywhere from the pages of Vogue to a TV advert for Procter & Gamble. The 25-year-old, who is based in Shropshire, has been modelling for a year but already has a full-time career, earning up to £100 an hour.
Emily, who has been modelling for a year, has appeared everywhere from the pages of Vogue to a TV advert for Procter & Gamble.
The 25-year-old, who is based in Shropshire, has been modelling for a year but already has a full-time career, earning up to £100 an hour.
The 25-year-old, who is based in Shropshire, has been modelling for a year but already has a full-time career, earning up to £100 an hour. Emily, who has been modelling for a year, has appeared everywhere from the pages of Vogue to a TV advert for Procter & Gamble.
Emily, who has been modelling for a year, has appeared everywhere from the pages of Vogue to a TV advert for Procter & Gamble. The 25-year-old, who is based in Shropshire, has been modelling for a year but already has a full-time career, earning up to £100 an hour.
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9664634146341463
 45%|████▌     | 9/20 [01:31<01:45,  9.59s/it][Prompt]:
Northern Ireland's tourism board is hitting back at actor Kit Harington after the Game of Thrones heartthrob cracked a few jokes at the expense of its capital city. Harington, who plays the character Jon Snow, poked fun at Belfast and tourism bosses when he appeared on a late-night chat show to promote the HBO series’ return to TV screens. The 28-year-old Londoner joked to host Seth Myers that Belfast is ‘wonderful for two or three days’ and emphasized that he has spent five years filming in the city, drawing laughter from a studio audience. Scroll down for video . Game
[Reference Response]:
of Thrones star Kit Harington told host Seth Myers that Belfast is 'wonderful for two or three days' Northern Ireland is a principal filming location for Game of Thrones, which has a studio in Belfast, and fans travel from all corners of the world to visit beauty spots where scenes are shot. Tourism bosses have leveraged the show’s popularity to draw visitors and they said it has helped Belfast to become one of the most popular city break destinations in the UK. In a brief exchange on Monday night’s show Myers, host of Late Night with Seth Myers, which airs on NBC in the US, pointed out that Game of Thrones films in ‘a lot of incredible locations’, including Croatia and Spain. He added: ‘Your part isn’t in the nice places. What would you say to the traveller going to Belfast, or the tourist going to Belfast?’ The Londoner plays the character Jon Snow on the HBO programme, which is set to return for a fifth series . Harington said: ‘It’s wonderful for two or three days.’ Myers said: ‘And you’ve been there for years?’ Drawing more laughter from the audience, Harington replied: ‘Five years. No, I have to be careful about what I say.’ Harington added: ‘They’ve got a wonderful tourist board. They celebrate three things, which is having the most bombed hotel in Europe, which is great … and they built the Titanic, which is a ship that sunk on its maiden voyage and now they have Game of Thrones, the most depressing TV show in history. So it’s a wonderful, depressing tourist board.’ Host Seth Myers didn't include Belfast when he identified Game of Thrones' 'incredible' filming locations . Harington, appearing on Late Night with Seth Myers, said Belfast has a 'wonderful, depressing' tourism board . In response to the interview a Tourism Northern Ireland spokeswoman said the filming of Game of Thrones as a ‘key asset and a key area for growth in Northern Ireland.’ The spokeswoman told MailOnline Travel: 'Belfast and Northern Ireland is recognised as a great short break destination. 'Belfast was recently voted, for a fourth consecutive year by TripAdvisor, as one of the UK’s top 10 best destinations among travellers from around the world. 'In recent years significant investment into our tourism infrastructure has created unique visitor experiences. This includes Titanic Belfast which was recently named Europe’s number one visitor attraction and since it’s opening in 2012 has exceeded visitor number expectations, attracting over two million visitors from across 145 countries.' Tourism bosses said Titanic Belfast has attracted more than two million visitors from 145 countries . The Dark Hedges in Country Antrim is one of the most recognisable filming locations from Game of Thrones . Belfast was named the seventh best city break in the UK in this year’s TripAdvisor Travellers’ Choice Awards. A spokeswoman for Visit Belfast added: ‘The success of big budget film and TV productions locating to Northern Ireland has provided the tourism industry with a unique and priceless opportunity to promote both our city and our spectacular rural setting to a truly global audience. ‘Belfast’s Titanic story and the filming of Game of Thrones at stunning sites across Northern Ireland have provided a powerful combination in attracting growing numbers to both Belfast and Northern Ireland over recent years. ‘Just as Titanic Belfast has become the city’s most popular visitor attraction, Game of Thrones, in its success, has created a demand for a growing number of tourism enterprises from bus tours, walking trails to activities such as archery and banquets. ‘All these complement the range of attractions, activities and events, great food and hospitality that Belfast and Northern Ireland already offers the short break visitor.’ Harington isn’t the first person affiliated with Game of Thrones to stir up controversy with comments about Belfast. Last year HBO’s president of programming, Michael Lombardo, apologised after he told US magazine Vulture that the show’s producers were struggling to adapt to life there. He said: 'It's a little bit of a personal challenge I don't think they contemplated when we initially found our location in Belfast, what that meant for them personally… Belfast is not the most cosmopolitan of cities to spend half of the year.' He added: 'I don't think they have a hard time, but the good news is work keeps them busy, let's just say that.'
[Model Response]:
of Thrones star Kit Harington, pictured, poked fun at Belfast and tourism bosses when he appeared on a late-night chat show to promote the HBO series’ return to TV screens. Harington, who plays the character Jon Snow, joked to host Seth Myers that Belfast is ‘wonderful for two or three days’ and emphasized that he has spent five years filming in the city, drawing laughter from a studio audience. The 28-year-old Londoner joked to host Seth Myers that Belfast is ‘wonderful for two or three days’ and emphasized that he has spent five years filming in the city, drawing laughter from a studio audience.
The 28-year-old Londoner joked to host Seth Myers that Belfast is ‘wonderful for two or three days’ and emphasized that he has spent five years filming in the city, drawing laughter from a studio audience.
But the NI Tourism Twitter account responded to the jibes, saying: ‘We’re not sure if it was the whiskey or the coffee, but Kit Harington certainly seemed to enjoy himself on @LateNightSeth.
‘While we’re not sure we’ll be getting a visit from Jon Snow any time soon, we’re glad he enjoyed his time in Belfast.
‘And, if he does decide to come back, we’ll be happy to show him the sights of our capital city again.’
The hit series, which has won 47 Emmys, will return to screens on April 14.
The hit series, which has won 47 Emmys, will return to screens on April 14. Game of Thrones is returning to screens on April 14.
But the NI Tourism Twitter account responded to the jibes, saying: ‘We’re not sure if it was the whiskey or the coffee, but Kit Harington certainly seemed to enjoy himself on @LateNightSeth. ‘While we’re not sure we’ll be getting a visit from Jon Snow any time soon, we’re glad he enjoyed his time in Belfast. ‘And, if he does decide to come back, we’ll be happy to show him the sights of our capital city
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9393939393939394
 50%|█████     | 10/20 [01:42<01:40, 10.01s/it][Prompt]:
Burnley boss Sean Dyche has told striker Danny Ings to keep on smiling - and the goals will return. The relegation-battling Clarets have struggled for goals in recent weeks, despite some gritty performances, scoring just once in six games. The hotly-rated Ings, whose future beyond the end of the season has been the subject of considerable speculation, has not found the net in seven appearances. Danny Ings has found goals hard to come by in recent weeks as he looks to try and fire Burnley to safety . Dyche hopes the barren spell is not weighing too heavily on the
[Reference Response]:
23-year-old's mind and has urged him to focus on enjoying his game. Dyche said: 'He's a bright young lad. He's a very good player and a good young lad who is grounded. 'But you can't actually get inside someone. When that whistle blows it's down to them to remind themselves of that freedom I speak about. I want players to play that way. 'His biggest thing is he puts a lot of demand on himself - and that can be a weakness as well as a strength. It's good that he has a thirst to improve, as do a lot of the players. But it has to be balanced with that enjoyment. Sean Dyche is confident that if Ings starts to enjoy playing more, then the goals will flow for the striker . 'I often say to him, play with a smile and I've told him he's best when he does. We're looking to him to continue doing that.' Burnley's battling performances have earned plaudits and despite the lack of goals, they have collected five points from a tough run of eight games. Amid that run they have beaten Manchester City and taken points off Chelsea and Tottenham. They are in the bottom three but just two points from safety and Dyche is backing his forwards to come good again. He said: 'There's certainly not pressure (on the strikers) from me. We ventured down this road early season when the goals didn't come as freely then we had a good patch over the Christmas period. 'We have scored goals and been productive in front of goal. It's about reminding the players what it takes to do that, different ways of doing that and how we can affect games.' The 23-year-old has had an impressive season nonetheless, scoring nine goals in his debut top-flight year . Ashley Barnes (right) says he's forgotten about the Nemanja Matic incident and moved on . Striker Ashley Barnes insists confidence remains high among the group. Barnes said: 'We are in this together. We are striving for one thing - to stay in this league come the end of the season. That is the main aim. 'The positivity around the group and the staff remains the same and hopefully will continue.' Barnes has found himself in the spotlight of late following his controversial tackle on Chelsea's Nemanja Matic. The 25-year-old escaped punishment but Matic was sent off for his reaction to the challenge in a heated confrontation. Barnes says that incident is now behind him. 'It has gone,' he said. 'I moved on a while back. I am just concentrating on staying in this league.'
[Model Response]:
22-year-old, who has been linked with a move to Liverpool. "I think he is a very happy lad, he is a very happy lad," said Dyche. "I think he is a very positive lad, he is a very positive lad. I think he is a very good lad, he is a very good lad. "He has been in the team and he has played well. I think he has been unfortunate in front of goal, but I think he is a positive lad, I think he is a positive lad. "I think he is a happy lad, I think he is a happy lad. I think he is a positive lad, I think he is a positive lad. "I think he is a very good lad, he is a very good lad." Burnley are just a point above the relegation zone, with Hull City and Bournemouth breathing down their necks. Dyche added: "We have to keep going and keep going and keep going. "I think we have to keep going and keep going and keep going, and I think we will. "I think we have to keep going and keep going and keep going, and I think we will."
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.848605577689243
 55%|█████▌    | 11/20 [01:48<01:18,  8.78s/it][Prompt]:
An infertile woman convinced her new husband to repeatedly rape her 15-year-old daughter so she could have another child. Misty Machinshok, 33, has been jailed for 15 to 30 years for the abuse in which she 'coached' the pair on the best positions to conceive, and held her daughter's hand 'the first few times'. She planned to tell friends and family that the teenager got pregnant with a stranger at a house party in their home town of Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania. Her 29-year-old husband Gary Machinshok, who she met through a website called onlinebootycall.com, will be sentenced this month after pleading
[Reference Response]:
no contest to raping the child 'every few days' throughout 2013. Jailed: Misty Machinshok, 33, pleaded no contest to all charges for convincing her new husband to rape her 15-year-old daughter. The court heard it was a plot to have another child, as she is no longer fertile . He also admitted to sexually assaulting her 11-year-old sister but struck a plea deal which means he cannot be charged for it. Prosecutor Nancy Violi called the crime 'the most heinous' she had dealt with in 14 years on the job. The rape came to light when one of the girl's friends alerted a teacher who called police, Violi said. Both victims are now in foster care. Awaiting sentencing: Her husband Gary Machinshok, 29, whom she met on onlinebootycall.com, has admitted raping the girl 'every few days' in 2013, and sexually assaulting her 11-year-old sister . It is not clear why Mrs Machinshok is no longer able to have children. In January, she pleaded guilty to rape, aggravated assault, conspiracy, child endangerment and other counts. Defense attorney Mary Deady conceded that her client had made 'a lot of bad decisions,' but said she was pleading guilty to protect the child from having to testify. Mrs Machinshok' father, Bill Englert, also leaped to her defense to say her involvement in the rape was 'over-emphasized' by prosecutors, according to Inquisitr.
[Model Response]:
guilty to rape.
A mother-of-two was arrested for selling a 12-year-old girl for sex at a motel. Kala Cox, 30, was charged with promoting prostitution, child endangerment and contributing to the delinquency of a minor. The girl told police she was picked up by Cox and driven to the motel where she was forced to have sex with a man. Cox was also accused of pimping out another teenage girl, but the charges were dropped.
A teacher was arrested for having sex with a 14-year-old student at her home. Jillian Parker, 27, was charged with sexual battery and contributing to the delinquency of a minor. She was arrested after the teen's parents found explicit photos on her phone.
A 45-year-old man was arrested for having sex with a 15-year-old girl he met on the internet. Michael Hutchings was charged with sexual assault of a child, and was being held on $150,000 bond.
A 51-year-old man was arrested for having sex with a 15-year-old girl he met on the internet. Dennis Foster was charged with sexual assault of a child, and was being held on $150,000 bond.
A man was arrested for having sex with a 13-year-old girl he met on the internet. Robert E. Myers, 51, was charged with sexual assault of a child, and was being held on $150,000 bond.
A 39-year-old man was arrested for having sex with a 14-year-old girl he met on the internet. Michael W. Wilson was charged with sexual assault of a child, and was being held on $150,000 bond.
A man was arrested for having sex with a 14-year-old girl he met on the internet. Lonnie W. Gantt, 35, was charged with sexual assault of a child, and was being held on $150,000 bond.
A 39-year-old man was arrested for having sex with a 13-year-old girl he met on the internet. Paul W. Jones was
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.8811475409836066
 60%|██████    | 12/20 [01:59<01:15,  9.40s/it][Prompt]:
Freddie Roach insisted on Saturday that Floyd Mayweather does not deserve to be ranked alongside Manny Pacquiao as the leading fighters of their generation as the two boxers put the finishing touches to their preparations for the Fight of the Century in Las Vegas a week on Saturday. Roach, Pacquiao’s trainer, said he rated super-middleweight star Andre Ward and middleweight sensation Gennady Golovkin above Mayweather despite the American’s unbeaten record and his status as hot favourite for the May 2 showdown against Pacquiao. ‘Mayweather is undefeated so you have to give him a little credit for that,’ said Roach, ‘but
[Reference Response]:
he has picked and chosen his opponents and I don’t think he’s fought enough competition to be considered the best. You have to fight the best to be the best, I feel. He’s ducked a lot of guys. Manny Pacquiao's trainer Freddie Roach says that Floyd Mayweather cannot be considered best ever . Roach says that Mayweather has picked and chosen his fights during his career . ‘Manny has had some devastating losses in his career but he is a realist. He understands that losing is part of the game and if you don’t think you are going to get knocked out in this sport, you have picked the wrong sport. I’d put Ward and Triple G above Mayweather right now. They are very talented guys and very polished boxers.’ Roach has been vocal in an otherwise low-key and surprisingly respectful build-up to the welterweight showdown next month and knows that his tactics have made the stakes even higher for him. But he is adamant Pacquiao will spring a surprise in the most eagerly awaited fight for years. ‘The fight will be won and lost on the ropes,’ said Roach. ‘If Mayweather goes to the ropes and tries to rest his legs, he will get beat. If he has good movement the entire night and his legs don’t give out on him, he’ll probably win. It’s about outscoring him. If he sits on the ropes, we can outscore him. If he stays in the middle of the ring and boxes all the time he could possibly outscore us.’ Roach claimed Pacquiao is in the best shape of his life, moving faster and punching harder than ever before. ‘He trains harder than any fighter I have ever had in my life,’ said Roach. ‘I have had 33 world champions and nobody can touch him for his work ethic. His attitude is good. ‘This fight can send out a message about what we need to do in boxing. When the best fights the best, do you see how big this is? Someone needs to wake up and put the best with the best all the time. Because when that happens, we have the best sport in the world. I don’t care who likes who, you can still negotiate business. Roach rates super middleweight Andre Ward higher than he does undefeated Mayweather . Roach, who has trained Pacquiao for 15 years, says the Filipino is in the best shape of his life . ‘It’s a better fight today than it was five years ago because they were both a lot faster and more mobile five years ago and it might have been more of a boxing match but now they’re a little bit older, it’s going to be a better fight. ‘I believe Manny can win this fight. I kind of have to win this fight. I’ve been talking a lot. It’s more important than anything to me. It’s more important to me than getting my girlfriend, Maya, back. It’s that big because, I mean, I really like this girl. ‘My mother told me, “You must like her; you put her Christmas tree up for her, you bought her a car and those earrings you bought her cost £14,000 each”. ‘After this fight maybe I’ll try to get her back.’
[Model Response]:
he’s not in the same class as Pacquiao. I’d put Ward and Golovkin ahead of him. He’s a very good fighter, but he’s not in the same class as Pacquiao. I think that’s the way it’s going to play out.’ Roach, who has been involved in some of the most famous fights of the past two decades, was speaking at the final press conference for the Mayweather-Pacquiao fight at the MGM Grand in Las Vegas. Roach, who has trained Pacquiao since 2001, said he had been impressed with Mayweather’s preparations, but was convinced that Pacquiao’s hunger would carry him to victory. ‘I think Mayweather has been training very hard,’ said Roach. ‘He’s been working very hard on his defence. I think he’s going to be very good defensively. ‘But I think Pacquiao is going to win. He’s a great fighter and he’s hungry. He’s got a lot of motivation. ‘He’s a fighter who’s not going to give up. He’s going to go in there and try to knock Mayweather out. ‘He’s going to be in there with Mayweather and he’s going to try to knock him out. I think he’s going to be successful.’ Roach said that Pacquiao had not been distracted by the fight’s huge build-up and was focused solely on beating Mayweather. ‘Manny has not been distracted by the hype,’ he said. ‘He’s been in training camp and he’s focused on the fight. ‘He’s not worried about anything. He’s just focused on Mayweather.’ Mayweather, 38, has been installed as a 1/16 favourite to beat Pacquiao, 36, by many bookmakers, with the fight widely expected to be the richest in boxing history. The bout will be shown live on pay-per-view in the UK and Ireland.
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9036697247706422
 65%|██████▌   | 13/20 [02:09<01:07,  9.61s/it][Prompt]:
An apprentice electrician fell off a ladder and died in front of his father after he was electrocuted while testing lights in a factory, an inquest has heard. Nathan Brown, 19, was working with his father David, an experienced electrician, when he apparently touched a set of exposed electrical bars powering a crane. The shock caused him to fall 12ft head first onto the roof of a toilet block below the crane. He was airlifted to hospital but later died from his injuries. Tragic: Apprentice electrician Nathan Brown died after being electrocuted while testing lights . Accident: Nathan fell 12ft
[Reference Response]:
from a ladder after being electrocuted, and later died of his injuries . The inquest in Oldham heard that Nathan - described by his family as a 'cheeky, happy boy' - trained to become an electrician so he could follow in his father's footsteps. The pair were both working at Eurofabs UK Ltd, a sheet metal manufacturer in Rochdale, Greater Manchester, when tragedy struck in September 2013. Nathan was told to climb up a ladder onto the walkway of a crane and test the lights in the building's roof, taking readings and shouting them down to his father - a task as easy as plugging in a television. But he accidentally touched a 400-volt busbar, a metal strip which conducts electricity within a switchboard, while he was trying to climb high enough to carry out the tests. Forensic pathologist Philip Lumb told the inquest he found burn marks consistent with electrocution on Nathan's arm. Family: The 19-year-old was working with his father David, an experienced electrician, at the time of his death . He said: 'I gather Nathan was an apprentice electrician who was working for his father and contracted by a company called Eurofabs to conduct a complete electrical inspection. 'One of his duties was to inspect one part of the roof. In order to gain access, Nathan had to get on top of a toilet block and place a ladder against an electrical crane to access the platform where the lights were located. 'His father was working in the premises at the time. A short time late his father saw Nathan fall head first into the roof of the toilet block, about 12ft. He did not note any sounds of attempts to break his fall. 'He went to attend to him but found him in a collapsed condition, although his father said he may be able to feel a pulse.' Dr Lumb told the inquest the cause of Nathan's death was electrocution and that he probably suffered cardiac arrest before falling to the ground. His mother Nicole, 47, said she learnt of the accident when she was called by her other son Gary, who worked at Eurofabs. She told the inquest: 'He said, "Don't panic mum but Nathan has had a fall." I remember saying, "Why, what happened?" He said, "He has fallen from a ladder." 'I asked if he was OK and he said he didn't know as he wasn't conscious. He said, "You need to get here as soon as you can mum." I just rushed out the house and got on the car and drove straight over. 'I remember running up the stairs to get to him. I just got more or less up the stairs and I saw the paramedics trying to save him.' Workplace: Nathan and his father were carrying out electrical tests at Eurofabs UK in Rochdale . In a statement Mr Brown, 50, who has been an electrician for 32 years, said that his son had joined him as an apprentice in September 2012 after embarking on a three-year training course, and had completed health and safety training a month before the fatal accident. He said: 'As an apprentice he was learning on the job and only ever allowed to complete basic tasks such as basic electrics, switches, sockets and lights. 'You would only ever allow Nathan to carry out work when safe for him to do so and work within capability, knowledge and competence.' Mr Brown said he had carried out work at the Eurofabs premises twice before, and on this occasion was carrying out a general electrical survey which he likened to an 'MOT.' He said he decided to put a ladder over the toilet block beneath a 10-tonne travelling crane and had not seen the busbar overhead. He told the inquest: 'As far as I am aware the busbar should have been marked up in a sleeve with the marking "danger high voltage". I have never come across a busbar not sleeved and marked with an appropriate sign. 'Had I been aware of the presence of the busbars in such unprotected conditions then I would not have continued to take this work. In all 32 years' experience with busbars I have seen them properly protected and never come across exposed busbars as present on the day of the accident. 'That was the worst and fastest day of my life. It's a blur but I can't get rid of some of those thoughts. The test he was doing would be as simple as plugging a TV into a wall. 'I'm completely devastated by the accident and life will never be the same again. He was the light of my life and my family and I will miss him so much. Time is a great healer and I hope that will be the case.' The inquest continues.
[Model Response]:
head first onto the roof of a toilet block below the crane . Nathan, from Wrexham, North Wales, had been working for his father’s company, E & D Brown Electrical, at the time of the accident. The inquest heard that Mr Brown was testing the lights in the crane at the BP factory in Ellesmere Port, Cheshire, when the incident happened. He was wearing a hard hat but not a safety harness. His father, who was working on a different part of the site, heard a loud bang and ran to see his son lying on the roof of the toilet block. He said: “I saw Nathan lying on the roof of the toilet block. I could see he was unconscious and there was a lot of blood. “I got on the roof and tried to lift him. I got him up and tried to get him to the edge of the roof but he was unconscious. “I shouted for help and someone came and got a stretcher. I tried to get him on the stretcher but he was too heavy.” The inquest heard that Nathan had been working on the site for about two weeks. He was wearing a hard hat but not a safety harness. A post mortem examination revealed that he had died from multiple organ failure. The inquest was told that the crane had been tested and certified safe by a third party and was being used on the day of the accident. Mr Brown, who was working on a different part of the site, said that he heard a loud bang and ran to see his son lying on the roof of the toilet block. He said: “I saw Nathan lying on the roof of the toilet block. I could see he was unconscious and there was a lot of blood. “I got on the roof and tried to lift him. I got him up and tried to get him to the edge of the roof but he was unconscious. “I shouted for help and someone came and got a stretcher. I tried to get him on the stretcher but he was too heavy.” The inquest heard that Nathan had been working on the site for about two weeks. He was wearing a hard hat but not a safety harness. A post mortem examination revealed that he had died from multiple organ failure. The inquest was told that the crane had been
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9037656903765691
 70%|███████   | 14/20 [02:20<01:00, 10.16s/it][Prompt]:
Scientists have used a gecko as inspiration to create super-strong robots that can carry over 100 times their own weight. The nine-gram robots - built by mechanical engineers at Stanford University in California - can haul more than a kilogram up a vertical wall. Another robot created by the scientists - nicknamed μTug - weighs just 12 grams and can drag a weight up to 2000 times heavier. They are so successful they could be used in emergencies, in factories or on construction sites in the future. New footage shows one robot slowly pulling an older model up a wall
[Reference Response]:
as it hangs on a delicate piece of string. David Christensen, a student in the Cutkosky Lab, compared the robots' achievements to a human pulling a blue whale. He told New Scientist: 'You can do some pretty amazing things.' Scientists have used a gecko as inspiration to create super-strong robots, one pictured, that can carry over 100 times their own weight . Geckos have small hairs on their feet to enable them to scurry across ceilings and walls without falling off. The robots' 'feet' are covered in tiny rubber spikes, mimicking these hairs. They were built under a microscope using tweezers. They will be presented next month at the International Conference on Robotics and Automation in Seattle, Washington. Geckos have small hairs on their feet to enable them to scurry across ceilings and walls without falling off. The tiny hairs create a weak bond with the area they are standing on, allowing them to get a strong foothold. As they are not sticky, they are also able to attach and detach their feet easily. These adhesives toepads are what inspired the scientists at Stanford University. The robots' 'feet' are covered in tiny rubber spikes, mimicking the hairs. When pressure is applied by the robot climbing the wall the spikes bend, which increases their surface area and allows them to 'bond' to the surface. Only one foot moves at a time to ensure the robot moves forward without falling down.
[Model Response]:
. The researchers say the robots could be used to lift people out of danger in the event of an earthquake or to carry out repairs in the case of a gas leak. They are also being used in factories to carry around heavy items. The robots are made from a material called shape memory alloy. This is a metal that can be twisted into a new shape and then return to its original form when heated. The researchers say that it is this property that makes the robots so strong. The robots can be controlled with a small remote control.
The scientists have used a gecko as inspiration to create super-strong robots that can carry over 100 times their own weight. The nine-gram robots - built by mechanical engineers at Stanford University in California - can haul more than a kilogram up a vertical wall. Another robot created by the scientists - nicknamed μTug - weighs just 12 grams and can drag a weight up to 2000 times heavier. They are so successful they could be used in emergencies, in factories or on construction sites in the future. New footage shows one robot slowly pulling an older model up a wall.
The researchers say the robots could be used to lift people out of danger in the event of an earthquake or to carry out repairs in the case of a gas leak. They are also being used in factories to carry around heavy items. The robots are made from a material called shape memory alloy. This is a metal that can be twisted into a new shape and then return to its original form when heated. The researchers say that it is this property that makes the robots so strong. The robots can be controlled with a small remote control.
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9505813953488372
 75%|███████▌  | 15/20 [02:28<00:47,  9.45s/it][Prompt]:
(CNN)Hockey player Jarret Stoll of the L.A. Kings was arrested Friday at the swimming pool of a Las Vegas resort on a drug-possession charge, CNN affiliate KSNV reported, citing a police spokesman. Stoll, 32, was charged with possession of controlled substances, including cocaine and ecstasy, according to KSNV. He was released from the Clark County Detention Center late Friday on $5,000 bail. The Kings said in a statement, "We are aware of police reports out of Clark County, Nevada regarding Jarret Stoll. Our organization is concerned and has begun conducting a thorough internal investigation. While we continue to actively gather
[Reference Response]:
facts, we are withholding further comment at this time." The Canadian player is a center and has been with the Kings since 2008. The Kings, who won the Stanley Cup two of the past three seasons, did not make the NHL playoffs this season. He is reportedly involved with TV personality Erin Andrews, who is a Fox Sports reporter and co-hosts "Dancing with the Stars." CNN contacted the Las Vegas Metropolitan Police Department to confirm details on Stoll's arrest, but according to the dispatcher no information was available until the beginning of the week.
[Model Response]:
information, we will have no further comment at this time." Stoll, who was drafted by the Kings in 2003, has played 622 games for the team and has scored 128 goals and 163 assists. He was a member of the Kings' 2012 Stanley Cup championship team. He also played for the New York Rangers and the Edmonton Oilers.
Labels: Jarret Stoll, LA Kings, Las Vegas, NHL, Vegas
WTF?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9582417582417583
 80%|████████  | 16/20 [02:38<00:38,  9.55s/it][Prompt]:
Heartwarming photos have emerged of a man rescuing five beloved horses from the severe flooding in his rural town triggered by the worst storm in a decade in New South Wales. Steve Spowart helped the horses' owner, Sonia Sharrock, to lead the animals to safety near Dungog, in the NSW Hunter region - one of the hardest hit areas in the state - where three people died in the severe weather, four houses were washed away and the town received the most rainfall it had in 100 years. Mr Spowart, in a black wetsuit, paddled out on his surfboard to
[Reference Response]:
where the horses were stranded, past trees, bushes and fences submerged in the floodwater that was almost as high as his shoulders. Scroll down for video . Steve Spowart rescues five horses from flood water on April 22 near Dungog, a small town in the NSW Hunter Valley region . Mr Spowart paddled out to where the horses were stranded, with concentration etched on his face . His tough journey to save the animals was captured as he paddled past submerged trees and bushes . As he managed to get hold of a brown horse in what was once a field surrounded by a fence, the man clung to its mane to lead it to safety . The moving images show the concentration on his face as he moves towards the animals and his concern as he struggles to lead them out of the deep murky water. In one photo, a startled brown horse attempts to flee as the man is kicked backwards into the water. The man and owner Ms Sharrock, in a green jacket, then appear to try and calm the animal to coax it to come with them without any reins. A young boy with a tin motor boat waits in shallow water as they walk a chestnut and two white horses out of the flood. The brown horse reared up after becoming caught in barbed wire, splashing and throwing the man back into the storm water . The brown horse stood off against the two rescuers, Sonia Sharrock and Mr Spowart, in fear of the terrifying floods . The man was helped by two women as he led two white and one chestnut horse out of the deep water towards a young boy and a boat . On Wednesday morning, the NSW Premier called on flood victims to 'hang tough' as the storm slowly moved down the south coast. 'Obviously, in the areas particularly impacted in the Hunter, Newcastle and across the Central Coast, we ask those communities to hang tough,' Mr Baird said. He said 'areas such as Dungog and Maitland, parts of the Central Coast' would be declared natural disaster zones but a state of emergency would not be announced. The community of Dungog in the Hunter region is said to be in 'shock' after three residents who died in dangerous weather conditions on Tuesday were identified as Robyn McDonald, aged about 70, Colin Webb, 79, and Brian Wilson, 72, the Newcastle Herald reported. The SES says it has had about 8000 requests for help and conducted 90 flood rescues since Monday, and about 200,000 homes and businesses remain without power. More than 260 SES crews and 600 volunteers will be out in the field on Wednesday. The barefooted man looked more relieved as he held on tightly to one horse's rein after emerging from the water . Ms Sharrock, in a green coat, talks to a chestnut horse as it follows her to safety out of the storm water in Dungog . A small smile crosses her face as she gets on to shallow ground with her animals . The white horse stands tall amidst the stormy skies in Dungog, an area that has been hit especially hard by the storm . The man carried ropes and reins on his surfboard as he made his way to the horses . As Mr Spowart walked out of the water, there was an eerie calm while the rain continued to fall .
[Model Response]:
rescue the horses, named Dusty, Pistol, Gypsy, Rusty and Princess, from the floodwaters. He said the horses were 'stranded in a paddock, with the water rising'. 'I went and got them out and brought them down to the road,' he told the Daily Telegraph. 'We were there for about an hour and a half.' Mr Spowart, who has been surfing for more than 40 years, said the horses were 'scared' but he was able to calm them down. 'They were a little bit scared but they were OK,' he said. 'I just had to calm them down and talk to them. 'They were a little bit scared but they were OK. I just had to calm them down and talk to them.' Mr Spowart said he was out surfing when he saw the floodwaters rising and decided to help Ms Sharrock, who was 'freaking out'. 'I said to her, 'I'll get the horses out for you',' he said. 'I went and got them out and brought them down to the road. 'We were there for about an hour and a half.' The 58-year-old said he was glad he could help the horses. 'It was pretty good to be able to help them out,' he said. 'It was pretty good to be able to help them out.' Ms Sharrock, who is a horse trainer, said she was 'very grateful' to Mr Spowart for helping her save her horses. 'I'm very grateful for him,' she said. 'He's a good bloke.' 'I'm very grateful for him,' she said. 'He's a good bloke.' Ms Sharrock said she was worried the horses would be washed away in the floodwaters. 'I was very worried about the horses,' she said. 'I was very worried about the horses.' 'I was very worried about the horses.'
https://nnimgt-a.akamaihd.net/transform/v1/crop/frm/silverstone-feed-data/9c388717-1d33-424f-8147-22346731901f.jpg/r0
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.8868312757201646
 85%|████████▌ | 17/20 [02:49<00:30, 10.05s/it][Prompt]:
Washington (CNN)One former employee of the private Blackwater Worldwide security company was sentenced Monday to life in prison and three others to 30 years each behind bars for their roles in a 2007 mass shooting in Baghdad that left 17 people dead. A federal jury convicted the four in October after a lengthy trial that saw some 30 witnesses travel from Iraq to testify against the security contractors. Prosecutors accused the men of illegally unleashed "powerful sniper fire, machine guns and grenade launchers on innocent men, women and children." Senior U.S. District Court Judge Royce Lamberth sentenced Blackwater sniper Nicholas
[Reference Response]:
Slatten to a term of life in prison, mandatory for his first-degree murder conviction. Blackwater workers Paul Slough, Evan Liberty and Dustin Heard were sentenced to 30 year each, plus one day. Slough was convicted of 13 counts of voluntary manslaughter, 17 counts of attempted manslaughter and a firearms offense. The jury convicted Liberty of eight counts of voluntary manslaughter, 12 counts of attempted manslaughter and a firearms offense. Heard was found guilty of six counts of voluntary manslaughter, 11 counts of attempted manslaughter and a firearms offense. According to prosecutors, the four were among seven Blackwater employees who opened fire in the Nusoor Square traffic circle in Baghdad, killing 17 people. An FBI investigation found 14 of the deaths unjustified, according to rules of engagement for private security contractors in Iraq. Slatten was accused of firing the first shots. Survivors of shooting tell FBI their stories in 2007 . Blackwater said its convoy came under attack, and defense attorneys said in court that witness accounts were fabricated. But witnesses testified that the contractors opened fire without provocation. "It was horror," said Hasan Jaber, an attorney who was driving to work when he was shot three times. "People running out of their cars were being shot at. ... Anything that moved in Nusoor Square was shot. Women, children, young people, they shot everyone." Among the dead were two boys, 9 and 11, a doctor, a used car salesman, a truck driver, a businessman, an Iraqi soldier, a gardener, a taxi driver and an aspiring doctor taking his mother to an appointment, according to prosecutors. The parents and brothers of the 9-year-old victim were present in court during the sentencing hearing and spoke. Ali Razzaq's father looked at the defendants and yelled in broken English: "If I kill anyone in his family, what he do?! Today, we will see who will win, the law or Blackwater," he said. "Blackwater killed my son." Dad in 2007: Blackwater blew up son's and wife's 'skulls' The defense presented character witnesses, family members and former colleagues who testified to the defendants' capacity to work under fire and willingness to help others. Each defendant also gave a closing statement. Slatten addressed the court last, taking the opportunity to declare his innocence. Lamberth rejected his argument. The judge said that the punishments reflected the seriousness of the crimes. He said that the U.S. government "should be commended for finding and exposing the truth of what happened." Blackwater incident witness in 2007: 'It was hell' A few gasps were heard in the courtroom, and some crying. The case was initially dismissed in 2008 after a judge found the Justice Department withheld key evidence and violated the rights of the contractors. A federal appeals court reversed the ruling, paving the way for the two-month trial that ended in convictions for the four. Another contractor, Jeremy Ridgeway, pleaded guilty in 2008 to voluntary manslaughter and attempt to commit manslaughter and testified for the government. He has not yet been sentenced. Blackwater lost its $1 billion contract with the State Department to protect American diplomatic personnel in 2009, after the Iraqi government refused to renew the company's operating license. The company was later renamed and sold, and now operates as ACADEMI, providing protection services and training. 2007 congressional report: Blackwater most often shoots first . Wesley Bruer reported in Washington. Michael Pearson reported and wrote in Atlanta.
[Model Response]:
Slatten to life in prison, while Paul Slough, Evan Liberty and Dustin Heard were sentenced to 30 years each. The judge ordered all four to pay $40 million in restitution to the victims' families. The sentencing comes nearly a decade after the incident, which occurred on September 16, 2007. The four men were found guilty of 14 counts of manslaughter and other charges, including using firearms in the commission of a crime of violence, conspiracy to commit manslaughter and obstruction of justice. The defendants were part of a security detail for a U.S. State Department convoy in Baghdad. A civilian contractor was also killed in the attack. The four men were acquitted of murder charges, which had been the most serious charges they faced. The defendants claimed they were acting in self-defense when they opened fire on a crowd of unarmed civilians after a car bomb exploded near the convoy. The victims included a 9-year-old boy. "The crimes these defendants have committed are among the most serious and heinous that can be committed on foreign soil," U.S. Attorney Channing Phillips said in a statement. "Their actions were not only a gross violation of international law, but a shocking and unconscionable attack on the people of Iraq." The Blackwater guards were part of a convoy protecting a State Department diplomatic mission in Baghdad when a car bomb exploded, killing one contractor and wounding others. The four defendants testified that they believed they were under attack from insurgents, and they fired in self-defense. The guards said they had fired warning shots in the air to deter attackers. But Iraqi witnesses testified that the shooting was indiscriminate and that the Blackwater guards had fired directly at civilians, killing them. "The only evidence that was presented was that the defendants were shooting at civilians and that they were not shooting at a legitimate threat," defense attorney Robert O'Brien said after the verdict. The four men were found guilty of 14 counts of manslaughter, attempted manslaughter, conspiracy to commit manslaughter and other charges.
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.8011363636363636
 90%|█████████ | 18/20 [03:01<00:21, 10.76s/it][Prompt]:
The 19-year-old, named locally as Moses Yitzchok Greenfeld (above) from Stamford hill, London, was pulled from the water in Hampstead Heath, north London, after getting into difficulty while swimming . Police officers 'watched' as a group of teenagers desperately tried to save their friend who drowned in Hampstead Heath pond, it has been claimed. Moses Yitzchok Greenfeld, 19, from Stamford Hill, London, had been swimming with four friends as temperatures reached 25C when he got into difficulty. An eyewitness has said at least seven police officers stood on a bank and watched as the boys dived in and out looking
[Reference Response]:
for their friend. The teenagers were reportedly heard shouting to ambulance crews on the side, asking how long someone could survive under water as they scrambled around trying to save their friend. It is thought Mr Greenfield may have had a cardiac arrest because of the shock of jumping into the cold water. His body was eventually discovered five foot below the surface and 20ft from the water's edge just before 11pm on Wednesday - nearly six hours after he was reported in trouble at 5.30pm. James Eisen, a 43-year-old freelance journalist, said: 'I was walking past and I could see a lot of commotion going on over the far side of the pond. 'The guy's friends were going in and out of the water and holding their breath and diving under frantically. 'There were police officers and paramedics and firefighters on the bank just standing there watching while the boys dived under. There was at least seven police officers on the side. 'It was a chaotic and surreal scene. 'I heard one of the boys shouting to one of the ambulance crews and asking how long someone could survive under water without breathing as they continued swimming around in a panic. 'I'm guessing the emergency services are told not to go into the water but if that's the case they probably shouldn't have let the boys carry on swimming about. 'Before I left the police helicopter was flying over and they had launched some boats onto the pond.' Mr Grunfeld's family have paid tribute to the teenager, who they described as a 'wonderful' and 'friendly' man, but said there was no blame because they believed that was the way God was meant to 'take him.' Mr Greenfeld, who is from the Orthodox Jewish community and is thought to have lost his Rabbi father to cancer five years ago, had recently flown home to London from New York, where he was studying religion at a Jewish college. Tragically, he only returned the UK to be with his family during the Passover holiday. His sister, who asked not be named, said: 'He was a wonderful young man and lovely brother who was very well liked, friendly, and he will be dearly missed by his family and friends. 'He was very into studies but he was very fun to be with and he would always try to lend a hand.” Police, specialist divers and 30 firefighters scoured the water for the missing teenager and his body was found five foot below the surface just before 11pm last night. He got into difficulty while swimming with four friends . 'We believe that whatever God does is for the good, so if that’s the way he [God] was meant to take him [Moses] then it must be good for him and for us, because it was meant to be. 'So there’s no blame, no pointing, because what was meant to happen, happened, and there was nothing anybody could have done to avoid it.' Speaking of the police response she added: 'Of course we would have liked it if they could have got their quicker. But we really appreciate what the police have done and they treated us and our religious beliefs with respect. 'They waited for Jewish men to come [to the pond] to handle the body, and we really appreciate that.' The group had been swimming outside of the designated area and out of hours at a time when no lifeguards were on duty, it was claimed. Members of his family gathered at the edge of the large pond – which had been packed in the day with sunbathers – as specialist divers from the Marine Policing Unit and around 30 firefighters scoured the water for him. Emergency services workers could be seen taking a stretcher into the park after the discovery of the body . The tragedy came on the hottest day of the year so far as temperatures reached 25.1C at St James's Park in the capital and in Frittenden, Kent. It is believed Mr Greenfeld may have suffered a heart attack brought on by the sudden change in body temperature after diving into the chilly 8C pond, the Evening Standard reported. A friend of Mr Greenfeld told the newspaper: 'He arrived with pals after driving up from Hackney. They got here after 5pm and the lifeguard was not on duty. 'I think Moses got into difficulty in the shallow part of the pond but there's a steep drop-off. They recovered his clothes from the side of the pond. 'His mother is devastated. He lost his father to cancer when he was young.' The boys had entered the water after the 4.30pm closure wearing what Mr Eisen described as boxers or swimming shorts. He was seen scrambling in a 10ft deep section of the pond and shouting for help before he disappeared under the surface. Emergency services were called just after 5.30pm and a subsequent search involved 30 firefighters, a police marine unit and a police helicopter. The young man's body was eventually pulled out at about 11pm after extensive searches of the murky water. The heath is controlled by the Corporation of London and a spokesman said that officers had not entered the water to try and save the drowning teenager. Last night, members of Mr Grenfeld's family gathered at the edge of the large pond – which had been packed in the day with sunbathers – as specialist police divers and around 30 firefighters scoured the water for him . Members of the Hatzola team, a group which provides 24/7 emergency care and ambulance services in London, were also called to the scene, along with a police helicopter, specialist divers and about 30 firefighters . A spokesman said: 'The heath constabulary officers are here to enforce bylaws in the park, they are not trained lifeguards and the water is dangerous and very murky, so they are advised they are not to go in until proper assistance arrives. 'He was swimming away from the designated area and out of hours so there were no lifeguards on duty. 'There are signs everywhere warning people not to go into the water at these times. 'Visibility in the water is about six inches, it's very murky, and you can barely see in front of your face. 'He had swum out over a ten foot drop and was about 20 feet from the side when he experienced difficulty - you have to be a strong swimmer to be out there. 'It is a complete tragedy but these are the facts behind it.' The Metropolitan Police confirmed a report was now being prepared for the coroner. The heath was full of sunbathers as the incident unfolded yesterday, as dozens of people had gathered to enjoy the unseasonably warm weather. One man, who claimed to be Mr Grenfeld's uncle, said the teenager had gone swimming with friends. He said: 'He went swimming and he must have struggled and he cannot be found. It's very tragic. They did the surface search and they called it off. The divers are coming in. That will change it from a rescue to a recovery.' Henna Anaya, who was on the heath with her son at the time of the incident, said: 'There were about four friends, all of them in the water, and they were swimming. I told my son they were just messing around. 'The next minute someone said to me he was going down and waving his arm and telling his friend to help, he was sinking. There were guys jumping in to help. The guy who went in told me that police had asked him to get out of the water.' Specialist police divers and around 30 firefighters joined the search for a 19-year-old man who got into difficulty while swimming in Hampstead Ponds in Hampstead Heath, north London, yesterday afternoon . Police were initially called to the scene just after 5.30pm after receiving reports from concerned members of the public that a teenager was in difficulty and under the water. His body was retrieved fromt the lake at 11pm . Another witness, who didn't wish to be named, said: 'It was right at the other end from where the lifeguard would have been, so by the time he was struggling, it would've already been too late. 'One woman said she heard the boys shouting for help, but only realised afterwards because at the time she couldn't understand what they were saying. 'The emergency services arrived very quickly, but you can't make miracles. It's just a tragedy.' Andrew Dutton-Parish, a regular swimmer at the Men's Pond who was also at the heath, added: 'It's such a sad start to the summer. It's very rare for anyone to be drowned.' A London Ambulance Service spokesperson said paramedics arrived on the scene within eight minutes, but the emergency teams, accompanied by a police helicopter, were unable to save the young man. The teenager is the second person to have died while swimming on the heath in the past two years. In August 2013, photographer Sussie Ahlburg, 51, from Holborn, drowned in the ladies' bathing pond. It later emerged she had a heart condition and had been warned not to swim in 'open water' by a cardiologist. Hampstead Heath has three swimming ponds which can become extremely busy in good weather. Despite temperatures reaching 25C in London yesterday, waters remained cool on the heath, with temperatures recorded at about 8C. Hampstead Ponds in Hampstead Heath, north London (pictured), is a popular spot for residents and tourists .
[Model Response]:
for their friend.
The 19-year-old, named locally as Moses Yitzchok Greenfeld (above) from Stamford hill, London, was pulled from the water in Hampstead Heath, north London, after getting into difficulty while swimming . Police officers 'watched' as a group of teenagers desperately tried to save their friend who drowned in Hampstead Heath pond, it has been claimed.
Moses Yitzchok Greenfeld, 19, from Stamford Hill, London, had been swimming with four friends as temperatures reached 25C when he got into difficulty.
An eyewitness has said at least seven police officers stood on a bank and watched as the boys dived in and out looking for their friend.
A source said: 'I saw the police officers watching on the bank and they didn't do anything to help.
'They just stood there and watched as the boys dived in and out of the water trying to find their friend.
'The police didn't even call for help.
'It was awful to watch as the boys jumped in and out of the water trying to find their friend.
'They were calling his name and looking for him in the water.
'It was heartbreaking to watch as they dived in and out of the water trying to find him.
'I was there when the police arrived and they just stood there watching as the boys dived in and out of the water.
'They didn't even call for help.
'I was really upset to see that they didn't do anything to help.
'I don't understand why they didn't call for help.
'It was awful to watch as the boys jumped in and out of the water.
'They were calling his name and looking for him in the water.
'I was there when the police arrived and they just stood there watching as the boys dived in and out of the water.
'I don't understand why they didn't call for help.
'It was awful to watch as the boys jumped in and out of the water.
'They were calling his name and looking for him in the water. It was heartbreaking to watch as they dived in and out of the water trying to find him.
'I was there
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.9037656903765691
 95%|█████████▌| 19/20 [03:14<00:11, 11.32s/it][Prompt]:
Mary Day (pictured outside court) fraudulently claimed £16,500 of income support and disability allowance and used the money to go on holidays . A benefits cheat who pocketed almost £17,000 of taxpayers' money and spent it on a string of luxury holidays despite having £27,000 in the bank has avoided jail. Mary Day, 60, of Swanage in Dorset, used taxpayers' money to go on luxury holidays to the Indian resort of Goa for up to a month each time. Day fraudulently claimed £16,500 of income support and disability allowance despite having £27,000 of her own savings in the bank. Her
[Reference Response]:
savings were £11,000 above the £16,000 threshold for savings while claiming such benefits, which meant she was overpaid benefits for more than four years. Day went on three trips to tourist hotspot Goa in 2009, 2011 and 2014, but failed to tell the authorities. She was caught following an anonymous tip-off to benefits officers. Day has now pleaded guilty to five counts of dishonestly failing to notify the Department for Work and Pensions of a change in circumstances affecting her ability to claim benefits. District Judge Stephen Nicholls sentenced her to three months in prison, but suspended the sentence for 12 months as she pleaded guilty and had repaid the money. Sentencing Day at Bournemouth Magistrates Court, he said: 'You have been credited with the guilty plea and I have taken into account that you have no previous convictions. 'Clearly this is rather a large sum of money which you have claimed. But you pleaded guilty to all matters and monies have been repaid. 'This does cross the custody threshold and I will impose a sentence of 12 weeks' custody suspended for 12 months.' Day was also ordered to pay £85 towards prosecution costs and a victim surcharge of £80. Tax watchdog The Taxpayers' Alliance said Day's sentence would do little to discourage others from committing benefit fraud. Chief executive Jonathan Isaby said: 'Benefit fraud isn't just stealing from taxpayers, but takes money away from those who really need it. Day went on trips to tourist hotspot Goa in 2009, 2011 and 2014, but did not tell the authorities . 'With finances so tight, we must crack down on those who seek to game the system for their own advantage and minimise the amount of taxpayers' cash swindled by fraudsters. 'Taxpayers will wonder whether punishments like this - or the lack thereof - do enough to discourage others from attempting the same crime.' A Department for Work and Pensions spokesman said: 'Benefit payments should go to those who really need them. 'We know it's a small minority of people who commit benefit fraud, but deliberately not informing us of a change in your condition that may affect your claim is a crime.' Day (pictured left with a friend) claimed £16,500 of income support and disability allowance despite having £27,000 in savings .
[Model Response]:
benefit cheating was discovered when her former partner, who was also claiming benefits, told a neighbour about her extravagant lifestyle.
Day was caught out after she was visited by a Department for Work and Pensions investigator who found she was lying about her income and had taken a series of expensive holidays to the Far East. The investigator discovered she had made 31 trips to the Indian resort of Goa, staying for up to a month each time.
She also spent thousands on holidays to Spain, France, Turkey and the United Arab Emirates. Day, who was originally from London but had lived in Swanage for 10 years, was jailed for 16 months at Poole Crown Court. She was also ordered to pay £10,000 compensation.
Judge Peter Johnson told her: "You took advantage of the system and you used the money to fund your extravagant lifestyle. "You are a woman who was not short of money but you were not prepared to tell the truth."
The court heard that Day, who was previously in a relationship with a man who was also claiming benefits, was found to have been dishonest when her former partner told a neighbour that she was claiming money for which she was not entitled.
He told the court that Day had been living in a luxury flat in Swanage with a swimming pool and a hot tub.
The court heard that Day had been living a "double life" and had told neighbours that she was a carer for her disabled son.
She was also found to have been dishonest in her tax returns.
Day admitted 22 counts of fraud by false representation between April 2006 and December 2009. She was also found guilty of one count of failing to notify a change of circumstances between May 2006 and May 2008.
Prosecutor Simon Clayson said Day had been claiming benefits despite having a significant amount of money in her bank account.
He said: "She had a significant amount of money in her bank account and she had a property in Swanage with a swimming pool and a hot tub."
Day's defence solicitor, Jonathan Hughes, said that Day had suffered a stroke in 2008 and had been unable to work since. He said
[Acceptance Rate]: 0.8614457831325302
100%|██████████| 20/20 [03:25<00:00, 11.29s/it]100%|██████████| 20/20 [03:25<00:00, 10.28s/it]
{'predicted_text': {'rouge-l': 0.1422962248325348, 'rouge-1': 0.27960005402565, 'rouge-2': 0.06149978190660477, 'rouge-3': 0.01776020973920822, 'bleu_score': 0.0, 'exact_match': 2440.10009765625}, 'acceptance_rate': {'mean': 0.9022674322128296}, 'total_time': {'mean': 9.625466227531433}, 'time_per_token': {'mean': 0.02046923032030463}, 'tokens_per_second': {'mean': 48.97999210357666}}
